Washington statutes.
RCW 18.155.010

Findings—Construction.

The legislature finds that sex offender therapists who examine and treat sex offenders pursuant to the special sexual [sex] offender sentencing alternative under RCW 9.94A.670 and who may treat juvenile sex offenders pursuant to RCW 13.40.160, play a vital role in protecting the public from sex offenders who remain in the community following conviction. The legislature finds that the qualifications, practices, techniques, and effectiveness of sex offender treatment providers vary widely and that the court's ability to effectively determine the appropriateness of granting the sentencing alternative and monitoring the offender to ensure continued protection of the community is undermined by a lack of regulated practices. The legislature recognizes the right of sex offender therapists to practice, consistent with the paramount requirements of public safety. Public safety is best served by regulating sex offender therapists whose clients are being evaluated and being treated pursuant to RCW 9.94A.670 and 13.40.160. This chapter shall be construed to require only those sex offender therapists who examine and treat sex offenders pursuant to RCW 9.94A.670 and 13.40.160 to obtain a sexual [sex] offender treatment certification as provided in this chapter.

[ 2000 c 171 s 32; 2000 c 28 s 37; 1990 c 3 s 801.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2000 c 28 s 37 and by 2000 c 171 s 32, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Technical correction bill—2000 c 28: See note following RCW 9.94A.015.

Effective date—2000 c 28: See RCW 9.94A.921.